inc/V-CLASS_A_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ñíiyägan - ENGLISH : # CLASS_A_STEM_2

     ñíiyä+V+DIRECT+PAST: ñíiyägan
     ñíiyä+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyägang
     ñíiyä+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyäganggang
     ñíiyä+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyägangang
     ñíiyä+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyägiinii
     ñíiyä+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyägaangaa
     ñíiyä+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyägaangaan
     ñíiyä+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñíiyä'uu
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'waa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'waa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'waang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñíiyä'wägan
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'aawaa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñíiyä'aawaan
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñíiyä'waas
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñíiyä'aawaas
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'waa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'aawaa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyägang'waa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyägang'waang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyägang'waa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'wägiinii
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'wägaangaa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'wägaangaan
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíiyä'waaäsaa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíiyä'waaäs
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waaäsaang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waaäsga
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waaäsaas
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'waaäsaa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'waa'uuj
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'waa'uujang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíiyä'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'waa'us
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'waa'ujaa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'waa'uujaangaa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waaäsaa'us
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñíiyä'waa'ahlanggang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñíiyä'waa'ahlanggan
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñíiyä'waa'ahlans
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'aawaa'ahlang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñíiyä'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñíiyä'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñíiyä'waa'ahl
     ñíiyä+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíiyä'waaäseehl
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñíiyä'ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'angga
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'anggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: ñíiyä'anggan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'aangaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: ñíiyä'aangaan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: ñíiyä'ans
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñíiyä'aangaas
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'angang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'aangaa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'anggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyägang'anggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyägang'angang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'anggiinii
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'anggaangaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'anggaangaan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíiyä'angäsaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíiyä'angäs
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'angäsaang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'angäsga
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'angäsaas
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'angäsaa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'uuj
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'uujang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíiyä'angäsaa'uujang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'us
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'ang'ujaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'ang'uujaangaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'angäsaa'us
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñíiyä'aang'ahlanggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: ñíiyä'aang'ahlanggan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'aang'ahlanggiinii
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíiyä'angäsaa'ahlans
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñíiyä'aang'ahlans
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'aangaa'ahlang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñíiyä'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñíiyä'aangaa'ahlanggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: ñíiyä'aang'ahl
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíiyä'angäseehl
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñíiyä'ang'uu
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'waa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'waa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'waang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñíiyä'ang'wägan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'ang'aawaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñíiyä'ang'aawaan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñíiyä'ang'waas
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñíiyä'ang'aawaas
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'ang'waa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'ang'aawaa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyägang'ang'waa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíiyägang'ang'waang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyägang'ang'waa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'ang'wägiinii
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'ang'wägaangaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'ang'wägaangaan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíiyä'ang'waaäs
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsaang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsga
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsaas
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíiyä'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'waa'uuj
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'waa'uujang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'waa'us
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'ang'waa'ujaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsaa'us
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñíiyä'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíiyä'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíiyä'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñíiyä'ang'waa'ahlans
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñíiyä'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñíiyä'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñíiyä'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñíiyä'ang'waa'ahl
     ñíiyä+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíiyä'ang'waaäseehl
